Wisconsin, session 2025, SB553.
do enact as follows:SB553,11Section 1. 20.927 (1g) of the statutes is renumbered 20.927 (1g) (intro.) and 2amended to read:SB553,2,3320.927 (1g) (intro.) In this section, “abortion”:SB553,2,54(a) 1. “Abortion” means the intentional destruction of the life of an unborn 5child, and “unborn child”.SB553,2,76(f) “Unborn child” means a human being from the time of conception 7fertilization until it is born alive birth.SB553,28Section 2. 20.927 (1g) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB553,3,10120.927 (1g) (a) 2. “Abortion” does not include a physician’s performance of a 2medical procedure or treatment designed or intended to prevent the death of a 3pregnant woman and not designed or intended to kill the unborn child, including an 4early induction or cesarean section performed due to a medical emergency or the 5removal of a dead embryo or dead fetus, or an ectopic pregnancy, anembryonic 6pregnancy, or molar pregnancy, which results in injury to or death of the woman’s 7unborn child when the physician makes reasonable medical efforts under the 8circumstances to preserve both the life of the woman and the life of her unborn child 9according to reasonable medical judgment and appropriate interventions for the 10gestational age of the child.SB553,311Section 3. 20.927 (1g) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB553,3,141220.927 (1g) (b) “Anembryonic pregnancy” means a pregnancy in which 13implantation occurs, but the embryo fails to develop, and the gestational sac and 14placenta grow, but the gestational sac remains empty.SB553,415Section 4. 20.927 (1g) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB553,3,171620.927 (1g) (c) “Ectopic pregnancy” means a pregnancy in which the embryo 17implants outside of the uterus, most commonly in the fallopian tube.SB553,518Section 5. 20.927 (1g) (d) of the statutes is created to read:SB553,3,211920.927 (1g) (d) “Molar pregnancy” means an abnormal pregnancy that occurs 20when a sperm fertilizes an egg that does not contain any genetic material and that 21cannot develop normally.SB553,622Section 6. 48.375 (2) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 48.375 (2) (a) 1.SB553,723Section 7. 48.375 (2) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB553,4,92448.375 (2) (a) 2. “Abortion” does not include a physician’s performance of a 1medical procedure or treatment designed or intended to prevent the death of a 2pregnant woman and not designed or intended to kill the unborn child, including an 3early induction or cesarean section performed due to a medical emergency or the 4removal of a dead embryo or dead fetus, or an ectopic pregnancy, anembryonic 5pregnancy, or molar pregnancy, which results in injury to or death of the woman’s 6unborn child when the physician makes reasonable medical efforts under the 7circumstances to preserve both the life of the woman and the life of her unborn child 8according to reasonable medical judgment and appropriate interventions for the 9gestational age of the child.SB553,810Section 8. 48.375 (2) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB553,4,121148.375 (2) (bm) “Anembryonic pregnancy” has the meaning given in s. 20.927 12(1g) (b).SB553,913Section 9. 48.375 (2) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:SB553,4,151448.375 (2) (dm) “Ectopic pregnancy” has the meaning given in s. 20.927 (1g) 15(c).SB553,1016Section 10. 48.375 (2) (f) of the statutes is created to read:SB553,4,171748.375 (2) (f) “Molar pregnancy” has the meaning given in s. 20.927 (1g) (d).SB553,1118Section 11. 69.01 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB553,4,201969.01 (1m) “Anembryonic pregnancy” has the meaning given in s. 20.927 (1g) 20(b).SB553,1221Section 12. 69.01 (9) of the statutes is created to read:SB553,4,222269.01 (9) “Ectopic pregnancy” has the meaning given in s. 20.927 (1g) (c).SB553,1323Section 13. 69.01 (13m) of the statutes is renumbered 69.01 (13m) (a).SB553,1424Section 14. 69.01 (13m) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB553,5,10169.01 (13m) (b) “Induced abortion” does not include a physician’s 2performance of a medical procedure or treatment designed or intended to prevent 3the death of a pregnant woman and not designed or intended to kill the unborn 4child, including an early induction or cesarean section performed due to a medical 5emergency or the removal of a dead embryo or dead fetus, or an ectopic pregnancy, 6anembryonic pregnancy, or molar pregnancy, which results in injury to or death of 7the woman’s unborn child when the physician makes reasonable medical efforts 8under the circumstances to preserve both the life of the woman and the life of her 9unborn child according to reasonable medical judgment and appropriate 10interventions for the gestational age of the child.SB553,1511Section 15. 69.01 (16p) of the statutes is created to read:SB553,5,121269.01 (16p) “Molar pregnancy” has the meaning given in s. 20.927 (1g) (d).SB553,1613Section 16. 253.10 (2) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 253.10 (2) (a) 1.SB553,1714Section 17. 253.10 (2) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB553,5,2415253.10 (2) (a) 2. “Abortion” does not include a physician’s performance of a 16medical procedure or treatment designed or intended to prevent the death of a 17pregnant woman and not designed or intended to kill the unborn child, including an 18early induction or cesarean section performed due to a medical emergency or the 19removal of a dead embryo or dead fetus, or an ectopic pregnancy, anembryonic 20pregnancy, or molar pregnancy, which results in injury to or death of the woman’s 21unborn child when the physician makes reasonable medical efforts under the 22circumstances to preserve both the life of the woman and the life of her unborn child 23according to reasonable medical judgment and appropriate interventions for the 24gestational age of the child.SB553,181Section 18. 253.10 (2) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB553,6,32253.10 (2) (bm) “Anembryonic pregnancy” has the meaning given in s. 20.927 3(1g) (b).SB553,194Section 19. 253.10 (2) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:SB553,6,65253.10 (2) (cm) “Ectopic pregnancy” has the meaning given in s. 20.927 (1g) 6(c).SB553,207Section 20. 253.10 (2) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:SB553,6,98253.10 (2) (dm) “Molar pregnancy” has the meaning given in s. 20.927 (1g) 9(d).SB553,2110Section 21. 253.10 (2) (h) of the statutes is amended to read:SB553,6,1111253.10 (2) (h) “Viability” has the meaning given in s. 940.15 (1) (e).SB553,2212Section 22. 939.75 (2) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 939.75 (2) (a) (intro.) 13and amended to read:SB553,6,1414939.75 (2) (a) (intro.) In this subsection, “induced abortion”:SB553,7,4153. “Induced abortion” means the use of any instrument, medicine, drug or 16other substance or device in a medical procedure with the intent to terminate the 17pregnancy of a woman and with an intent other than to increase the probability of 18a live birth, to preserve the life or health of the infant after live birth or to remove a 19dead fetus. “Induced abortion” does not include a physician’s performance of a 20medical procedure or treatment designed or intended to prevent the death of a 21pregnant woman and not designed or intended to kill the unborn child, including an 22early induction or cesarean section performed due to a medical emergency or the 23removal of a dead embryo or dead fetus, or an ectopic pregnancy, anembryonic 24pregnancy, or molar pregnancy, which results in injury to or death of the woman’s 1unborn child when the physician makes reasonable medical efforts under the 2circumstances to preserve both the life of the woman and the life of her unborn child 3according to reasonable medical judgment and appropriate interventions for the 4gestational age of the child.SB553,235Section 23. 939.75 (2) (a) 1. of the statutes is created to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb553 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb553 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB553 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB553 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB553: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting